New Jersey, session 221, A4589.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legalized Games of Chance Control Commission shall adopt regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), authorizing licensees to accept payment in the form of credit cards, debit cards, or other electronic payment device for the purpose of allowing an individual to participate in a raffle, bingo, or penny auction under the "Bingo Licensing Law," P.L.1954, c.6 (C.5:8-24 et seq.), and the "Raffles Licensing Law," P.L.1954, c.5 (C.5:8-50 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.